North Carolina statutes. Chapter 28. Administration. [Repealed]
§§ 28-1 through 28-201.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1329, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 1973, c. 1329, repealed this Chapter, enacted a new Chapter 28A, Administration of Decedents’ Estates, and redesignated the original Chapter 28A, Estates of Missing Persons, as Chapter 28C. Sections 28-68, 28-68.1, 28-68.2, and 28-68.3 were transferred and renumbered to

G.S. 28A-25-6

by the 1973 act. Section 28-53 was transferred and renumbered G.S. 36-67 (repealed, see now

G.S. 36A-107

) by the 1973 act.